test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kaavir_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - käävir: # 2A v-k, v->h, VV > V
    käävir+N+Sg+Nom: kääṿir
    käävir+N+Sg+Gen: kääḥir
    käävir+N+Sg+Acc: kääḥir
    käävir+N+Sg+Ill: käḥirân
    käävir+N+Sg+Loc: käḥirist
    käävir+N+Sg+Com: käḥiráin
    käävir+N+Sg+Abe: kääḥirttáá
    käävir+N+Ess: käṿirin
    käävir+N+Par: käṿirid
    käävir+N+Pl+Nom: käḥireh
    käävir+N+Pl+Gen: käḥirij
    käävir+N+Pl+Acc: käḥirijd
    käävir+N+Pl+Ill: käḥiráid
    käävir+N+Pl+Loc: käḥirijn
    käävir+N+Pl+Com: käḥirijguin
    käävir+N+Pl+Abe: käḥirijttáá
